Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 5
DISTRICT TRUSTEES

Section.

[33-525]. Advance enrollment for military dependents.

33-501. Board of trustees.

Each school district shall be governed by a board of trustees. The board of trustees of each elementary school district shall consist of three (3) members, and the board of trustees of each other school district shall consist of five (5) members. Provided, however, that the board of trustees of any district which has had a change in its district boundaries subsequent to June 30, 1973, may consist of no fewer than five (5) nor more than nine (9) members if such provisions are included as part of an approved proposal to redefine and change trustee zones as provided in section 33-313, Idaho Code. The board of trustees of any district that has had a change in its district boundaries because of district consolidation on and after January 1, 2008, shall consist of five (5) members if two (2) districts consolidated or seven (7) members if three (3) or more districts consolidated. Commencing in 2018, a school district trustee shall be elected for a term of four (4) years beginning at twelve o’clock noon on January 1 next succeeding his election.

Each trustee shall at the time of his nomination and election, or appointment, be a school district elector of his district and a resident of the trustee zone from which nominated or appointed. In the event that a vacancy shall be declared as provided in section 33-504, Idaho Code, and the board of trustees is unable to appoint a trustee from the zone vacated after ninety (90) days, the board of trustees may appoint a person at-large from within the boundaries of the school district to serve as the trustee from the zone where the vacancy occurred.

Each trustee shall qualify for and assume office on January 1 next following his election, or, if appointed, at the regular meeting of the board of trustees next following such appointment. At the first meeting after a trustee assumes office, an oath of office shall be administered to the trustee, whether elected, reelected or appointed. Said oath may be administered by the clerk, or by another trustee, of the district, and the records of the district shall show such oath of office to have been taken, and by whom administered and shall be filed with the official records of the district.

33-502. Declarations of candidacy for trustees.

Any person legally qualified to hold the office of school trustee may file a declaration of candidacy for the office, each of which shall bear the name of the candidate, state the term for which declaration of candidacy is made, and bear the signature of not less than five (5) school district electors resident of the trustee zone of which the candidate is resident. The declaration shall be filed with the clerk of the board of trustees of the school district as provided in section 34-1404, Idaho Code.

33-502A. Declaration of intent for write-in candidates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 38, effective January 1, 2011.

33-502B. Board of trustees — One nomination — No election.

In any election for trustees, if, after the expiration of the date for filing written nominations for the office of trustee, it appears that only one (1) qualified candidate has been nominated for a position to be filled or if only one (1) candidate has filed a write-in declaration of intent as provided by section 34-1407, Idaho Code, and has provided to the district’s board clerk the signatures of five (5) electors of the candidate’s specific zone, then no election shall be held for that position. The board of trustees or the school district clerk, with the written permission of the board, shall declare such candidate elected as a trustee. The school district clerk shall immediately prepare and deliver to the person a certificate of election signed by him and bearing the seal of the district. The procedure set forth in this section shall not apply to any other school district election.

33-502C. Withdrawal of candidacy. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 38, effective January 1, 2011.

33-502D. Procedure for correction of ballots when a withdrawal occurs after printing

Notice. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 38, effective January 1, 2011.

33-503. Election of trustees — Uniform date.

The election of school district trustees including those in charter districts shall be on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November in odd-numbered years. Notice and conduct of the election, and the canvassing of the returns, shall be as provided in chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code. In each trustee zone, the person receiving the greatest number of votes cast within his zone shall be declared by the board of trustees as the trustee elected from that person’s zone.

If any two (2) or more persons residing in the same trustee zone have an equal number of votes and a greater number than any other nominee residing in that zone, then the board of trustees shall determine the winner by a toss of a coin.

Incumbent trustees as of the effective date of this act shall have their terms expire on January 1 following the November election of their successors.

33-503A. Transition of school trustee terms from three years to four years. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

33-504. Vacancies on boards of trustees.

A vacancy shall be declared by the board of trustees when any nominee has been elected but has failed to qualify for office, or within thirty (30) days of when any trustee shall (a) die; (b) resign as trustee; (c) remove himself from his trustee zone of residence; (d) no longer be a resident or school district elector of the district; (e) refuse to serve as trustee; (f) without excuse acceptable to the board of trustees, fail to attend four (4) consecutive regular meetings of the board; or (g) be recalled and discharged from office as provided in law.

Such declaration of vacancy shall be made at any regular or special meeting of the board of trustees, at which any of the above-mentioned conditions are determined to exist.

The board of trustees shall appoint to such vacancy a person qualified to serve as trustee of the school district provided there remains in membership on the board of trustees a majority of the membership thereof, and the board shall notify the state superintendent of public instruction of the appointment. Such appointment shall be made within ninety (90) days of the declaration of vacancy. After ninety (90) days, if the board of trustees is unable to appoint a trustee from the zone vacated, the board of trustees may appoint a person at-large from within the boundaries of the school district to serve as the trustee from the zone where the vacancy occurred. Otherwise, after one hundred twenty (120) days from the declaration of vacancy, appointments shall be made by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the district is situate, or of the home county if the district be a joint district.

Any person appointed as herein provided shall serve for the balance of the unexpired term of the office which was declared vacant and filled by appointment.

33-505. Board of trustees, district newly created.

Within ten (10) days after the entry of any order creating a new school district by the consolidation of districts or parts thereof, the trustees of all school districts involved in the consolidation shall meet at the call of the state superintendent of public instruction or his designee and, from their number, shall select a board of trustees of the new district representing each of the merged districts in an equal number to serve as follows: if two (2) districts consolidated, one (1) member representing the board of trustees of each district shall serve until the annual election of trustees next following; one (1) member representing the board of trustees of each district shall serve until the annual election the following year; and one (1) member appointed by the other four (4) members shall serve until the annual election in the year after that. If three (3) or more districts consolidated, three (3) members shall serve until the annual election of trustees next following; three (3) members shall serve until the annual election the following year; and one (1) member appointed by the other six (6) members shall serve until the annual election in the year after that. If the number of merged districts is greater than three (3), the superintendent of public instruction shall appoint as equally as possible from trustees of the previous districts so that each district, if possible, has representation on the consolidated district’s board of trustees. The superintendent shall stagger the terms of his appointments so that an equal number of appointees’ terms expire annually and those trustees shall sit for election. Thereafter, all trustees who are elected shall serve terms as provided in section 33-501, Idaho Code, for a board of trustees of a school district. The board of trustees shall report the names of said trustees to the state board of education. The board of trustees of the newly consolidated school district shall expeditiously redraw the trustee zones pursuant to section 33-313, Idaho Code.

The state board of education, at its first meeting next following receipt of notice of the creation of new school districts by the division of a district, shall appoint a board of trustees for each such new district, to serve until January 1 following the next election for school district trustees.

33-506. Organization and government of board of trustees.

Each board of school district trustees shall organize at its first regular meeting in January and elect a chairman, a vice chairman, a clerk and a treasurer. The clerk and the treasurer may be members of the board of trustees; or, in the discretion of the board, either or both may be selected from among competent and responsible persons outside the membership of the board. The board in its discretion may allow compensation for the clerk, and for the treasurer, if other than the county treasurer.

Each member of the board not otherwise compensated by public moneys shall be compensated for actual expenses incurred for travel to, from, and attending meetings of the board. Such compensation shall be paid from the district school funds.

It shall be the duty of each member of the board of trustees to attend all meetings, both regular and special; and the board shall have the following powers and duties:

To make bylaws, rules and regulations for its government and that of the district, consistent with the laws of the state of Idaho and the rules and regulations of the state board of education;

To call special meetings or elections for such purpose as may be necessary for the proper conduct and management of the school or schools of the district;

To employ an attorney or attorneys when deemed for the best interests of the district, or for the purpose of defending the district against any suit or for bringing action deemed necessary to be commenced by the board.

33-507. Limitation upon authority of trustees.

It shall be unlawful for any trustee to have pecuniary interest, directly or indirectly, in any contract or other transaction pertaining to the maintenance or conduct of the school district or to accept any reward or compensation for services rendered as a trustee except as may be otherwise provided in this section. The board of trustees of a school district may accept and award contracts involving the school district to businesses in which a trustee or a person related to him by blood or marriage within the second degree has a direct or indirect interest provided that the procedures set forth in section 18-1361 or 18-1361A, Idaho Code, are followed. The receiving, soliciting or acceptance of moneys of a school district for deposit in any bank or trust company, or the lending of money by any bank or trust company to any school district, shall not be deemed to be a contract pertaining to the maintenance or conduct of a school district within the meaning of this section; nor shall the payment by any school district board of trustees of compensation to any bank or trust company, for services rendered in the transaction of any banking business with such district board of trustees, be deemed the payment of any reward or compensation to any officer or director of any such bank or trust company within the meaning of this section.

It shall be unlawful for the board of trustees of any class of school district to enter into or execute any contract with the spouse of any member of such board, the terms of which said contract requires or will require the payment or delivery of any school district funds, money or property to such spouse, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section or in section 18-1361 or 18-1361A, Idaho Code.

No spouse of any trustee may be employed by a school district with a fall student enrollment population of greater than one thousand two hundred (1,200) in the prior school year. For school districts with a fall student enrollment population of one thousand two hundred (1,200) or less in the prior school year and for schools funded pursuant to the provisions of section 33-1003(2), Idaho Code, such spouse may be employed in a nonadministrative position for a school year if each of the following conditions has been met:

The position has been listed as open for application on the school district website or in a local newspaper, whichever is consistent with the district’s current practice, and the position shall be listed for at least sixty (60) days, unless the opening occurred during the school year, in which case the position shall be so listed for at least fifteen (15) days. If the position is listed in a newspaper, the listing shall be made in a manner consistent with the provisions of section 60-106, Idaho Code;

No applications were received that met the minimum certification, endorsement, education or experience requirements of the position other than such spouse;

The trustee abstained from voting in the employment of the spouse and was absent from the meeting while such employment was being considered and determined.
The school district or school may employ such spouse for further school years, provided that the conditions contained in this subsection are met for each school year in which such spouse is employed. The trustee shall abstain from voting in any decisions affecting the compensation, benefits, individual performance evaluation or disciplinary action related to the spouse and shall be absent from the meeting while such issues are being considered and determined. Such limitation shall include, but not be limited to: any matters relating to negotiations regarding compensation and benefits; discussion and negotiation with district benefits providers; and any matter relating to the spouse and letters of reprimand, direction, probation or termination. Such limitations shall not prohibit the trustee spouse from participating in deliberation and voting upon the district’s annual fiscal budget or annual audit report. Any spouse of a trustee employed as a certificated employee pursuant to this subsection shall be employed under a category 1 contract pursuant to section 33-514A, Idaho Code.

When any relative of any trustee or relative of the spouse of a trustee related by affinity or consanguinity within the second degree is considered for employment in a school district, such trustee shall abstain from voting in the election of such relative and shall be absent from the meeting while such employment is being considered and determined.

33-508. Duties of clerk.

The clerk of the board of trustees shall have such duties as shall be prescribed by the board. He shall attend all meetings of the board of trustees, shall keep the record of the proceedings, and shall enter in said record all matters required by law, or by the board, so to be entered; and said record shall be open to inspection by any person, at all reasonable times.

When the clerk does not attend a meeting of the board of trustees, the board shall appoint some person who, as temporary clerk, shall keep the record of the proceedings of the board and certify the same to the clerk, to be entered by him.

Whenever in the judgment of the board of trustees it is deemed prudent so to do, the clerk may be placed under a fidelity bond, in the manner of section 33-509, in such amount as the board of trustees shall determine.

33-509. Duties of the treasurer.

The treasurer elected by the board of trustees of a school district shall have such duties as the board may prescribe. The treasurer shall be placed under fidelity bond issued by a surety company authorized to do business in the state of Idaho, in such amount as the board of trustees may from time to time determine, or under personal bond equal to twice such determined amount with at least two (2) sureties who each shall qualify as in the case of sureties on the bonds of county officers.

The county treasurer of the home county of any elementary school district with less than six (6) teachers within the district shall serve as treasurer of such district, if requested to do so by the school district board of trustees.

The treasurer shall account for the deposit of all moneys of the district in accordance with the provisions of the public depository law, chapter 1, title 57, Idaho Code.

33-509A. Assistant treasurers.

A board of trustees of a school district may elect one (1) or more assistant treasurers who shall have such duties as the board of trustees may prescribe. Assistant treasurers shall be subject to the control, supervision and direction of the treasurer of the district. An assistant treasurer may perform the statutory duties prescribed by law for the treasurer to the extent authorized by the board of trustees.

33-510. Annual meetings — Regular meetings — Boards of trustees.

The annual meeting of each school district shall be on the date of its regular January meeting in each year. Notice of the annual meeting of elementary school districts shall be given as provided in section 33-402, Idaho Code, but one (1) publication shall suffice.

Regular meetings of each board of school district trustees shall be held monthly, on a uniform day of a uniform week as determined at the annual meeting. Special meetings may be called by the chairman or by any two (2) members of the board and held at any time. If the time and place of special meetings shall not have been determined at a meeting of the board with all members being present, then notice of the time and place shall be given to each member and announced by written notice conspicuously posted at the school district office and at least two (2) or more public buildings within the school district not less than twenty-four (24) hours before such special meeting is to be convened.

A quorum for the transaction of business of the board of trustees shall consist of a majority of the members of the board. Unless otherwise provided by law, all questions shall be determined by a majority of the vote cast. The chairman of the board may vote in all cases.

All meetings shall conform to the provisions of chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code.

33-511. Maintenance of schools.

The board of trustees of each school district shall have the following powers and duties:

Each elementary school district shall maintain at least one (1) elementary school, and each other school district shall maintain at least one (1) elementary school and one (1) secondary school;

To employ necessary help and labor to maintain and operate the schools of the district;

To discontinue any school within the district whenever it shall find such discontinuance to be in the best interests of the district and of the pupils therein. For the purposes of this section, discontinuing a school shall mean no longer maintaining a school of any kind, at the same location, except in the case of secondary units as herein provided.

When any school proposed to be discontinued is one which was operated and maintained by a former district now wholly incorporated within the boundaries of the district operated by said board of trustees, and, immediately following reorganization and the dissolution of said former district, such school has been continuously operated and maintained at the same location by the presently organized district, the following procedures shall apply before discontinuing a school:

The board of trustees must first give notice of such proposal not later than the first day of July next preceding the date of the proposed discontinuance. Such notice shall be posted, and published once, in the manner provided in section 33-402, Idaho Code, and shall identify the school proposed to be discontinued.

If, not later than the first day of August following the posting and publishing of the notice of discontinuance, five (5) or more qualified school district electors residing within the school district shall petition the board of trustees for an election to be held within the school district on the question of discontinuance of that school, the board of trustees shall forthwith order an election to be held within fourteen (14) days of the date of said order and shall give notice of the election.

Notice of such election shall be posted at or near the main door of the school proposed to be discontinued and at or near the main door of the administrative offices of the school district and shall also be published in one (1) issue of a newspaper printed in the county in which is situate the school proposed to be discontinued. The notice shall state the date the election is to be held, the place of voting, and the hours between which the polls shall be open. In addition, the notice of election shall describe the area of the particular attendance unit of the school district and shall identify the school proposed to be discontinued; and it shall state that only qualified school district electors residing within the school district may vote on the question of discontinuing the school.

The election shall be held within the school district and there shall be submitted to the electors a ballot containing the proposal:

For discontinuing the school located at . . . .,

Against discontinuing the school located at . . . . .

If a majority of the qualified electors, as defined in this section and voting in the election, shall vote against discontinuing that school, then said school shall not be discontinued; and no proposal to discontinue the same school shall be made by the board of trustees of the district within nine (9) months after the date of the election.
(vi) If a secondary unit which the trustees of a district propose to close is more than thirty (30) miles by all-weather road from the attendance unit to which it is proposed to transfer such students, then, notwithstanding other provisions of this section, five (5) electors residing within the attendance area of the unit proposed to be closed may, as provided by this section, petition the board of trustees requesting an election to determine whether or not such attendance unit, or any portion of it, shall be closed. The board shall forthwith call and hold an election as herein provided. However, for the purpose of this section relating to the secondary attendance unit thirty (30) miles or more distant from another secondary attendance unit, only the patrons resident in this attendance area shall be eligible to vote, except for attendance units, or portions of them, created after January 1, 2002, in which case qualified school district electors throughout the school district shall be eligible to vote. The election shall be deemed passed and the unit shall not be closed if a majority of those voting in the election vote in favor of retaining the attendance unit.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply when:

The administrator of the division of building safety has determined that the school constitutes an imminent public safety hazard and has issued an order or notice requiring the school district superintendent, principal, board member or other person in charge to cause all persons, except those necessary to eliminate the condition, to be withdrawn from, and to be restrained from entering the school, pursuant to section 39-8008, Idaho Code; and

The school district board of trustees have voted at a public meeting to discontinue the school.

33-512. Governance of schools.

The board of trustees of each school district shall have the following powers and duties:

To fix the days of the year and the hours of the day when schools shall be in session. However:

Each school district shall annually adopt and implement a school calendar which provides its students at each grade level with the following minimum number of instructional hours:

School assemblies, testing and other instructionally related activities involving students directly may be included in the required instructional hours.

When approved by a local school board, annual instructional hour requirements stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be reduced as follows:

Up to a total of twenty-two (22) hours to accommodate staff development activities conducted on such days as the local school board deems appropriate.

Up to a total of eleven (11) hours of emergency school closures due to adverse weather conditions and facility failures.

Student and staff activities related to the opening and closing of the school year, grade reporting, program planning, staff meetings, and other classroom and building management activities shall not be counted as instructional time or in the reductions provided in paragraph (c)(i) of this subsection.

For multiple shift programs, this rule applies to each shift (i.e., each student must have access to the minimum annual required hours of instruction).

The instructional time requirement for grade 12 students may be reduced by action of a local school board for an amount of time not to exceed eleven (11) hours of instructional time.

The state superintendent of public instruction may grant an exemption from the provisions of this section for an individual building within a district, when the closure of that building, for unforeseen circumstances, does not affect the attendance of other buildings within the district.

The state board of education may grant a waiver of the minimum number of instructional hours for a school district when districtwide school closures are necessary as a result of natural occurrences creating unsafe conditions for students. A county or state disaster declaration must have been issued for one (1) or more of the counties in which the school district is located. A waiver request to the state board of education must describe the efforts by the school district to make up lost instructional hours, the range of grades impacted, and the number of hours the school district is requesting be waived.

The reduction of instructional hours allowed in paragraphs (f) through (h) of this subsection may not be combined in a single school year.

To adopt and carry on and to provide for the financing of a total educational program for the district. Such programs in other than elementary school districts may include education programs for out-of-school youth and adults, and such districts may provide classes in kindergarten;

To provide, or require pupils to be provided with, suitable textbooks and supplies, and for advice on textbook selections may appoint a curricular materials adoption committee as provided in section 33-512A, Idaho Code;

To protect the morals and health of the pupils;

To exclude from school, children not of school age;

To prescribe rules for the disciplining of unruly or insubordinate pupils, including rules on student harassment, intimidation and bullying, such rules to be included in a district discipline code adopted by the board of trustees and a summarized version thereof to be provided in writing at the beginning of each school year to the teachers and students in the district in a manner consistent with the student’s age, grade and level of academic achievement;

To exclude from school, pupils with contagious or infectious diseases who are diagnosed or suspected as having a contagious or infectious disease or those who are not immune and have been exposed to a contagious or infectious disease; and to close school on order of the state board of health and welfare or local health authorities;

To equip and maintain a suitable library or libraries in the school or schools and to exclude therefrom, and from the schools, all books, tracts, papers, and catechisms of sectarian nature;

To determine school holidays. Any listing of school holidays shall include not less than the following: New Year’s Day, Memorial Day, Independence Day, Thanksgiving Day, and Christmas Day. Other days listed in section 73-108, Idaho Code, if the same shall fall on a school day, shall be observed with appropriate ceremonies; and any days the state board of education may designate, following the proclamation by the governor, shall be school holidays;

To erect and maintain on each schoolhouse or school grounds a suitable flagstaff or flagpole, and display thereon the flag of the United States of America on all days, except during inclement weather, when the school is in session; and for each Veterans Day, each school in session shall conduct and observe an appropriate program of at least one (1) class period remembering and honoring American veterans;

To prohibit entrance to each schoolhouse or school grounds, to prohibit loitering in schoolhouses or on school grounds and to provide for the removal from each schoolhouse or school grounds of any individual or individuals who disrupt the educational processes or whose presence is detrimental to the morals, health, safety, academic learning or discipline of the pupils. A person who disrupts the educational process or whose presence is detrimental to the morals, health, safety, academic learning or discipline of the pupils or who loiters in schoolhouses or on school grounds, is guilty of a misdemeanor;
(12) To supervise and regulate, including by contract with established entities, those extracurricular activities which are by definition outside of or in addition to the regular academic courses or curriculum of a public school, and which extracurricular activities shall not be considered to be a property, liberty or contract right of any student, and such extracurricular activities shall not be deemed a necessary element of a public school education, but shall be considered to be a privilege. For the purposes of extracurricular activities, any secondary school located in this state that is accredited by an organization approved through a process defined by the state department of education shall be able to fully participate in all extracurricular activities described in and governed by the provisions of this subsection;

To supervise and regulate, including by contract with established entities, those extracurricular activities which are by definition outside of or in addition to the regular academic courses or curriculum of a public school, and which extracurricular activities shall not be considered to be a property, liberty or contract right of any student, and such extracurricular activities shall not be deemed a necessary element of a public school education, but shall be considered to be a privilege. For the purposes of extracurricular activities, any secondary school located in this state that is accredited by an organization approved through a process defined by the state department of education shall be able to fully participate in all extracurricular activities described in and governed by the provisions of this subsection;

To govern the school district in compliance with state law and rules of the state board of education;

To submit to the superintendent of public instruction not later than July 1 of each year documentation which meets the reporting requirements of the federal gun-free schools act of 1994 as contained within the federal improving America’s schools act of 1994;

To require that all certificated and noncertificated employees hired on or after July 1, 2008, and other individuals who are required by the provisions of section 33-130, Idaho Code, to undergo a criminal history check shall submit a completed ten (10) finger fingerprint card or scan to the department of education no later than five (5) days following the first day of employment or unsupervised contact with students in a K-12 setting, whichever is sooner. Such employees and other individuals shall pay the cost of the criminal history check. If the criminal history check shows that the employee has been convicted of a felony crime enumerated in section 33-1208, Idaho Code, it shall be grounds for immediate termination, dismissal or other personnel action of the district, except that it shall be the right of the school district to evaluate whether an individual convicted of one of these crimes and having been incarcerated for that crime shall be hired. Provided however, that any individual convicted of any felony offense listed in section 33-1208(2), Idaho Code, shall not be hired. For the purposes of criminal history checks, a substitute teacher is any individual who temporarily replaces a certificated classroom educator and is paid a substitute teacher wage for one (1) day or more during a school year. A substitute teacher who has undergone a criminal history check at the request of one (1) district in which he has been employed as a substitute shall not be required to undergo an additional criminal history check at the request of any other district in which he is employed as a substitute if the teacher has obtained a criminal history check within the previous five (5) years. If the district next employing the substitute still elects to require another criminal history check within the five (5) year period, that district shall pay the cost of the criminal history check or reimburse the substitute teacher for such cost. To remain on the statewide substitute teacher list maintained by the state department of education, the substitute teacher shall undergo a criminal history check every five (5) years;

To maintain a safe environment for students by developing a system that cross-checks all contractors or other persons who have irregular contact with students against the statewide sex offender registry, by developing a school safety plan for each school and by meeting annually with emergency first responders to update the plans and discuss emergency exercises and operations;
(17) To provide support for teachers in their first two (2) years in the profession in the areas of: administrative and supervisory support, mentoring, peer assistance and professional development.

Grades

Hours

9-12

990

4-8

900

1-3

810

K

450

Alternative schools

(any grades)

900

However, transportation to and from school, passing times between classes, recess and lunch periods shall not be included.

33-512A. District curricular materials adoption committees.

The board of trustees of each school district may appoint a curricular materials adoption committee to advise the board on selection of curricular materials, as defined in section 33-118A, Idaho Code, for use within the schools of the district. Such a committee shall contain a membership at least one-fourth (¼) of which is persons who are not public educators or school trustees. All meetings of the committee shall be open to the public and any member of the public may attend such a meeting and file written or make oral objections to any curricular materials under consideration. Each school district shall have on hand and available to the public the titles, authors and publishers of all curricular materials being used in the district. The public has the right to inspect the instructional materials, except students’ tests, used in the district’s schools.

33-512B. Suicidal tendencies — Duty to warn.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33-512(4), Idaho Code, neither a teacher nor a school district shall have a duty to warn of the suicidal tendencies of a student absent the teacher’s knowledge of direct evidence of such suicidal tendencies.

“Direct evidence” means evidence which directly proves a fact without inference and which in itself, if true, conclusively establishes that fact. Direct evidence would include unequivocal and unambiguous oral or written statements by a student which would not cause a reasonable teacher to speculate regarding the existence of the fact in question; it would not include equivocal or ambiguous oral or written statements by a student which would cause a reasonable teacher to speculate regarding the existence of the fact in question.

The existence of the teacher’s knowledge of the direct evidence referred to in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be determined by the court as a matter of law.

33-512C. Encouragement of gifted students.

If a student completes any required high school course with a grade of C or higher before entering grade 9, if that course meets the same standards that are required in high school, if the course is taught by a properly certified teacher who meets the federal definition of being highly qualified for the course being taught and if the school providing the course is accredited as recognized by the state board, the student shall be given a grade for the successful completion of that course, and such grade and the number of credit hours assigned to the course shall be transferred to the student’s high school transcript. The provisions of this section do not apply to senior projects.